Arkansas, session 2025, HB1466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-39-502 is amended to read as follows:
23-39-502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Affiliate" means a person that directly or indirectly
through one (1) or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is
under common control with the person;
(2)(A) "Allowable assets for liquidity" means assets that may be
used to satisfy liquidity requirements under this subchapter.
(B) "Allowable assets for liquidity" includes without
limitation:
(i) Unrestricted cash and cash equivalents; and
(ii) Unencumbered investment-grade assets held for
sale or trade;
(3) "Applicant" means a person that has applied to become
licensed under this subchapter as a loan officer, transitional loan officer,
mortgage broker, mortgage banker, or mortgage servicer;
(4) "Authorized user" means an employee, contractor, agent, or
other person that participates in a financial institution’s business
operations and is authorized to access and use a financial institution’s
*ANS120*
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
information systems and data;
(5) "Board of directors" means a formal body that is responsible
for corporate governance and compliance with this subchapter;
(2)(6) "Branch manager" means the individual who is in charge of
the business operations of one (1) or more branch offices of a mortgage
broker, mortgage banker, or mortgage servicer;
(3)(7) "Branch office" means a location that is separate and
distinct from the licensee's principal place of business and includes any
location from which business is conducted under the license or in the name of
the mortgage broker, mortgage banker, or mortgage servicer:
(A) The address of which appears on business cards,
stationery, or advertising used by the licensee in connection with business
conducted under this subchapter at the branch office;
(B) At which the licensee's name, advertising, promotional
materials, or signage suggests that mortgage loans are originated, solicited,
accepted, negotiated, funded, or serviced or from which mortgage loan
commitments or interest rate guarantee agreements are issued; or
(C) Which, due to the actions of any employee, associate,
loan officer, or transitional loan officer of the licensee, may be construed
by the public as a branch office of the licensee where mortgage loans are
originated, solicited, accepted, negotiated, funded, or serviced or from
which mortgage loan commitments or interest rate guarantee agreements are
issued;
(4)(8) "Commissioner" means the Securities Commissioner and
includes the commissioner's designees;
(9) "Consumer" means an individual or that individual's legal
representative who obtains or has obtained a financial product or service
from a financial institution that is to be used primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes;
(5)(A)(10)(A) “Control” means the power, directly or indirectly,
to direct the management or policies of a company, whether through ownership
of securities, by contract, or otherwise.
(B) A person is presumed to control a company if the
person:
(i) Is a director, general partner, or executive
officer of the company;
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
(ii) Directly or indirectly has the right to vote
twenty-five percent (25%) or more of a class of a voting security of the
company or has the power to sell or direct the sale of twenty-five percent
(25%) or more of a class of voting securities of the company;
(iii) In the case of a limited liability company, is
a managing member of the limited liability company; or
(iv) In the case of a partnership, has the right to
receive upon dissolution or has contributed ten percent (10%) or more of the
capital of the partnership;
(6)(11) “Control affiliate” means a partnership, corporation,
trust, limited liability company, or other organization that directly or
indirectly controls or is controlled by the applicant;
(7)(12) “Control person” means an individual who directly or
indirectly exercises control over the applicant;
(13)(A) "Corporate governance" means the structure of and how
the licensee is managed.
(B) "Corporate governance" includes the corporate rules,
policies, processes, and practices used to oversee and manage a licensee;
(14)(A) "Covered institution servicer” means a nonbank mortgage
servicer that:
(i) As reported in the mortgage call report,
services:
(a) Portfolios of two thousand (2,000) or more
of one (1) to four (4) unit residential mortgage loans serviced or
subserviced for others, excluding whole loans owned; and
(b) Loans being interim serviced before sale
as of the most recent calendar year end; and
(ii) Operates in two (2) or more states, districts,
or territories of the United States either currently or as of the prior
calendar year end.
(B) "Covered institution servicer" does not include:
(i) A person exempt from mortgage servicer licensing
requirements under this subchapter;
(ii) A mortgage servicer that has the status of a
tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as in effect on January
1, 2025; or
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
(iii) A mortgage servicer solely owning or conducting
reverse mortgage servicing, or both, or the reverse mortgage portfolio
administered by a large mortgage servicer;
(15) "Customer" means a consumer who has a customer relationship
with a financial institution;
(16) "Customer information" means a record containing nonpublic
personal information about a customer of a financial institution, whether in
paper, electronic, or other form, that is handled or maintained by or on
behalf of a financial institution or the financial institution’s affiliates;
(17) "Customer relationship" means a continuing relationship
between a consumer and a financial institution under which the financial
institution provides to the consumer one (1) or more financial products or
services that are used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;
(8)(18) "Employee" means an individual who is licensed with or
employed by a mortgage broker, mortgage banker, or mortgage servicer, whether
by employment contract, agency, or other arrangement and regardless of
whether the individual is treated as an employee for purposes of compliance
with the federal income tax laws;
(19) "Encryption" means the transformation of data into a form
that results in a low probability of assigning meaning without the use of a
protective process or key, consistent with current cryptographic standards
and accompanied by appropriate safeguards for cryptographic key material;
(9)(A)(20)(A) “Exempt person” means a person not required to be
licensed as a mortgage broker, mortgage banker, mortgage servicer, loan
officer, or transitional loan officer under this subchapter.
(B) “Exempt person” includes any of the following:
(i) An employee of a licensee whose responsibilities
are limited to clerical and administrative tasks for his or her employer and
who does not solicit borrowers, accept applications, or negotiate the terms
of loans on behalf of the employer;
(ii) An agency or corporate instrumentality of the
federal government or any state, county, or municipal government granting
mortgage loans under specific authority of the laws of any state or of the
United States;
(iii) A trust company or industrial loan company
chartered under the laws of Arkansas;
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
(iv) A small-business investment corporation licensed
under the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, 15 U.S.C. § 661 et seq., as
it existed on January 1, 2011 January 1, 2025;
(v) A real estate investment trust as defined in 26
U.S.C. § 856, as it existed on January 1, 2011 January 1, 2025;
(vi) A state or federally chartered bank, an
operating subsidiary of a state-chartered bank regulated by the State Bank
Department, a savings bank, a savings and loan association, or a credit
union, the accounts of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation or the National Credit Union Administration;
(vii) An agricultural loan organization that is
subject to licensing, supervision, or auditing by the United States Farm
Service Agency, Commodity Credit Corporation, Rural Development Housing and
Community Facilities Programs United States Department of Agriculture Rural
Development, United States Farm Credit Administration, or the United States
Department of Agriculture;
(viii) A nonprofit corporation that:
(a) Qualifies as a nonprofit entity under §
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(b) Is not primarily in the business of
soliciting or brokering mortgage loans; and
(c) Makes or services mortgage loans to
promote home ownership or home improvements for the disadvantaged;
(ix)(a) A licensed real estate agent or broker who
is performing those activities subject to the regulation of the Arkansas Real
Estate Commission.
(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (9)(B)(ix)(a)
subdivision (20)(B)(ix)(a) of this section, "exempt person" does not include
a real estate agent or broker who receives compensation of any kind in
connection with the referral, placement, or origination of a mortgage loan;
(x) A person who engages in seller-financed
transactions or who as a seller of real property receives mortgages, deeds of
trust, or other security instruments on real estate as security for a
purchase money obligation if:
(a) The person does not receive from or hold
on behalf of the borrower any funds for the payment of insurance or taxes on
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
the real property; and
(b) The seller does not sell the liens or
mortgages in the secondary market other than to affiliated or subsidiary
persons;
(xi) An individual or husband and wife married
couple who provide funds for investment in loans secured by a lien on real
property on his or her or their own account and who do not:
(a) Charge a fee or cause a fee to be paid for
any service other than the normal and scheduled rates for escrow, title
insurance, and recording services; and
(b) Collect funds to be used for the payment
of any taxes or insurance premiums on the property securing the loans;
(xii) An attorney licensed in Arkansas rendering
legal services to his or her client, when the conduct that would subject the
attorney to the jurisdiction of this subchapter is ancillary to the provision
of the legal services offered;
(xiii) A person performing any act under order of
any court;
(xiv) A person acting as a mortgage broker, mortgage
banker, or mortgage servicer for any person located in Arkansas, if the
mortgage broker, mortgage banker, or mortgage servicer has no office or
employee in Arkansas and the real property that is the subject of the
mortgage is located outside of Arkansas;
(xv) An officer or employee of an exempt person
described in subdivisions (9)(B)(ii)-(xiv) subdivisions (20)(B)(ii)-(xiv) of
this section if acting in the scope of employment for the exempt person; and
(xvi) A manufactured or modular home retailer and
its employees if:
(a) The manufactured or modular home retailer
or its employees perform only administrative or clerical tasks on behalf of a
person required to be licensed under this subchapter; or
(b) The manufactured or modular home retailer
and its employees:
(1) Do not receive compensation or
financial gain for engaging in loan officer activities that exceeds the
amount of compensation or financial gain that could be received in a
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
comparable cash transaction for a manufactured home;
(2) Disclose to the consumer in writing
any corporate affiliation with a mortgage banker;
(3) Provide referral information for at
least one (1) unaffiliated creditor if the manufactured or modular home
retailer has a corporate affiliation with a mortgage banker and the mortgage
banker offers a recommendation; and
(4)(A) Do not directly negotiate loan
terms with the consumer or lender.
(B) As used in subdivision
(9)(B)(xvi)(b)(4)(A) subdivision (20)(B)(xvi)(b)(4)(A) of this section, “loan
terms” includes rates, fees, and other costs;
(21) "External audit" means a formal report prepared by an
independent certified public accountant expressing an opinion on whether
financial statements are:
(A) Presented fairly, in all material aspects, according
to the applicable financial reporting framework; and
(B) Inclusive of an evaluation of the adequacy of a
company’s internal control structure;
(22) "Financial institution" means a mortgage broker, mortgage
banker, or mortgage servicer licensed under this subchapter;
(23)(A) "Financial product or service" means a product or
service that a financial holding company could offer by engaging in a
financial activity under section 4(k) of the Bank Holding Company Act of
1956, 12 U.S.C. § 1843(k), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(B) "Financial product or service" includes a financial
institution’s evaluation or brokerage of information that a financial
institution collects in connection with a request or an application from a
consumer for a financial product or service;
(24) "Information security program" means the administrative,
technical, or physical safeguards a financial institution uses to access,
collect, distribute, process, protect, store, use, transmit, dispose of, or
otherwise handle customer information;
(25) "Information system" means a discrete set of electronic
information resources organized for the collection, processing, maintenance,
use, sharing, dissemination, or disposition of electronic information,
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
including any specialized system, such as industrial controls system or a
process controls system, a telephone switching and private branch exchange
system, and an environmental control system, that contain customer
information or that is connected to a system that contains customer
information;
(26) "Interim serviced before sale" means the activity of
collecting a limited number of contractual mortgage payments immediately
after origination on loans held for sale but before the loans have been sold
into the secondary market;
(27) "Internal audit" means the internal activity of performing
independent, objective assurance, and consulting to evaluate and improve the
effectiveness of company operations, risk management, internal controls, and
governance processes;
(28)(A) "Key individual" means an individual who is ultimately
responsible for establishing or directing policies and procedures of a
licensee.
(B) "Key individual" includes without limitation:
(i) An executive officer;
(ii) A manager;
(iii) A director;
(iv) A trustee; or
(v) A control person;
(10)(29) “Licensee” means a loan officer, transitional loan
officer, mortgage broker, mortgage banker, or mortgage servicer that is
licensed under this subchapter;
(11)(A)(30)(A) "Loan officer" means an individual other than an
exempt person described in subdivision (9) subdivision (20) of this section
who in exchange for compensation as an employee of or who otherwise receives
compensation or remuneration from a mortgage broker or a mortgage banker:
(i) Solicits or offers to solicit an application for
a mortgage loan;
(ii) Accepts or offers to accept an application for
a mortgage loan;
(iii) Negotiates or offers to negotiate the terms or
conditions of a mortgage loan;
(iv) Issues or offers to issue a mortgage loan
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
commitment or interest rate guarantee agreement; or
(v) Provides or offers to provide modification of a
mortgage loan.
(B) “Loan officer” does not include:
(i) An individual who performs clerical or
administrative tasks in the processing of a mortgage loan at the direction of
and subject to the supervision and instruction of a licensed loan officer;
(ii) An underwriter if the individual performs no
activities under subdivision (11)(A) subdivision (30)(A) of this section; or
(iii) An individual who is solely involved in
extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as that term is defined in
11 U.S.C. § 101(53D), as it existed on January 1, 2011 January 1, 2025;
(12)(31) "Make a mortgage loan" means to close a mortgage loan,
to advance funds, to offer to advance funds, or to make a commitment to
advance funds to a borrower under a mortgage loan;
(13)(A)(32)(A) "Managing principal" means a person who meets the
requirements of § 23-39-508 and who agrees to be primarily responsible for
the operations of a licensed mortgage broker, mortgage banker, or mortgage
servicer.
(B) "Managing principal" includes a qualifying individual;
(14)(33) "Mortgage banker" means a person who engages in the
business of making mortgage loans for compensation or other gain;
(15)(34) "Mortgage broker" means a person who for compensation
or other gain or in the expectation of compensation or other gain and,
regardless of whether the acts are done directly or indirectly, through
contact by telephone, by electronic means, by mail, or in person with the
borrowers or potential borrowers:
(A) Accepts or offers to accept an application for a
mortgage loan;
(B) Solicits or offers to solicit an application for a
mortgage loan;
(C) Negotiates or offers to negotiate the terms or
conditions of a mortgage loan; or
(D) Issues or offers to issue mortgage loan commitments or
interest rate guarantee agreements to borrowers;
(35) "Mortgage call report" means a quarterly or annual report
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
of residential real estate loan origination, servicing, and financial
information completed by a company licensed through the Nationwide Multistate
Licensing System and Registry;
(16)(36)(A) "Mortgage loan" means a loan primarily for personal,
family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust,
reverse mortgage, or other equivalent consensual security interest
encumbering:
(A)(i) A dwelling as defined in section 1602(w) of
the Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2011 January 1, 2025; or
(B)(ii) Residential real estate upon which is
constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling.
(B) "Mortgage loan" includes a residential mortgage loan;
(17)(A)(37)(A) “Mortgage servicer” means:
(i) An entity performing the routine administration
of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of an owner of the related mortgage
under the terms of a servicing contract; or
(ii) a A person that receives or has the right to
receive from or on behalf of a borrower:
(i)(a) Funds or credits in payment for a
mortgage loan; or
(ii)(b) The taxes or insurance associated with
a mortgage loan.
(B) In the case of a home equity conversion mortgage or a
reverse mortgage, "mortgage servicer" includes a person that makes a payment
to the borrower;
(38) "Mortgage servicing rights" means the contractual right to
service residential mortgage loans on behalf of the owner of the associated
mortgage in exchange for specified compensation according to a servicing
contract;
(39) "Multifactor authentication" means authentication through
verification of at least two (2) of the following types of authentication
factors:
(A) Knowledge factors, including without limitation a
password;
(B) Possession factors, including without limitation a
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
token; or
(C) Inherence factors, including without limitation
biometric characteristics;
(40)(A) "Nonpublic personal information" means:
(i) Personally identifiable financial information;
and
(ii) A list, description, or other grouping of
consumers, and publicly available information pertaining to a consumer, that
is derived using personally identifiable financial information that is not
publicly available.
(B) "Nonpublic personal information" includes without
limitation a list of individuals’ names and street addresses that is derived
in whole or in part using personally identifiable financial information that
is not publicly available.
(C) "Nonpublic personal information" does not include:
(i) Publicly available information except as
included on a list described in subdivision (40)(A)(ii) of this section;
(ii) A list, description, or other grouping of
consumers, and publicly available information pertaining to the list,
description, or other grouping of consumers, that is derived without using
personally identifiable financial information that is not publicly available;
or
(iii) A list of individuals’ names and addresses
that contains only publicly available information and is not:
(a) Derived, in whole or in part, using
personally identifiable financial information that is not publicly available;
and
(b) Disclosed in a manner that indicates that
any of the individuals on the list is a consumer of a financial institution;
(41)(A) "Notification event" means acquisition of unencrypted
customer information without the authorization of the customer to which the
information pertains.
(B) For purposes of subdivision (41)(A) of this section:
(i) Customer information is considered unencrypted
if the encryption key was accessed by an unauthorized person; and
(ii) Unauthorized acquisition is presumed to include
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
unauthorized access to unencrypted customer information unless a financial
institution has reliable evidence showing that there has not been, or could
not reasonably have been, unauthorized acquisition of the customer
information;
(42) "Operating liquidity" means the funds necessary to perform
normal business operations, including payment of rent, salaries, interest
expense, and other typical expenses associated with operating an entity;
(18)(43) "Operating subsidiary" means a separate corporation,
limited liability company, or similar entity in which a national or state
bank, savings and loan association, or credit union, the accounts of which
are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National
Credit Union Administration, maintains more than fifty percent (50%) voting
rights, a controlling interest, or otherwise controls the subsidiary and no
other party controls more than fifty percent (50%) of the voting rights or a
controlling interest in the subsidiary;
(44) "Penetration testing" means a test methodology in which
assessors attempt to circumvent or defeat the security features of an
information system by attempting penetration of databases or controls from
outside or inside a financial institution’s information system;
(19)(45) "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited
liability company, limited partnership, corporation, association, or other
group engaged in joint business activities, however organized;
(46)(A) "Personally identifiable financial information" means
information:
(i) A consumer provides to a financial institution
to obtain a financial product or service from a financial institution;
(ii) About a consumer resulting from a transaction
involving a financial product or service between a financial institution and
a consumer; or
(iii) A financial institution otherwise obtains
about a consumer in connection with providing a financial product or service
to that consumer.
(B) "Personally identifiable financial information"
includes:
(i) Information a consumer provides to a financial
institution on an application to obtain a loan, credit card, or other
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
financial product or service;
(ii) Account balance information, payment history,
overdraft history, and credit or debit card purchase information;
(iii) The fact that an individual is or has been a
financial institution's customer or has obtained a financial product or
service from a financial institution;
(iv) Information about a financial institution’s
consumer if the information is disclosed in a manner that indicates that the
individual is or has been the financial institution’s consumer;
(v) Information that a consumer provides to a
financial institution or that a financial institution or a financial
institution’s agent otherwise obtains in connection with collecting on or
servicing a credit account;
(vi) Information a financial institution collects
through an internet cookie or an information collecting device from a
computer server; and
(vii) Information from a consumer report.
(C) "Personally identifiable financial information" does
not include:
(i) A list of names and addresses of customers of an
entity that is not a financial institution; and
(ii) Information that does not identify a consumer,
including aggregate information or blind data that does not contain personal
identifiers such as account numbers, names, or addresses;
(20)(47) "Principal place of business" means a stationary
construction consisting of at least one (1) enclosed room or building in
which negotiations of mortgage loan transactions of others may be conducted
in private or in which the primary business functions of the licensee are
conducted;
(48)(A) "Publicly available information" means information that
a financial institution has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made
available to the public from:
(i) Federal, state, or local government records;
(ii) Widely distributed media; or
(iii) Disclosures to the public that are required to
be made by federal, state, or local law.
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
(B) "Publicly available information" includes without
limitation:
(i) Information in government records, including
information in government real estate records and security interest filings;
and
(ii)(a) Information from widely distributed media,
including information from a telephone book, television or radio program,
newspaper, or website that is available to the public on an unrestricted
basis.
(b) A website is not restricted under
subdivision (48)(B)(ii)(a) of this section merely because an internet service
provider or a site operator requires a fee or a password, so long as access
is available to the public.
(C) For purposes of this subdivision (48), a financial
institution has a reasonable basis to believe that:
(i) Information is lawfully made available to the
public if the financial institution has taken steps to determine:
(a) That the information is of the type that
is available to the public; and
(b) Whether an individual can direct that the
information not be made available to the public and, if so, that the
financial institution’s consumer has not directed that the information not be
made available to the public;
(ii) Mortgage information is lawfully made available
to the public if the financial institution determines that the information is
of the type included on the public record in the jurisdiction where the
mortgage would be recorded; and
(iii) An individual’s telephone number is lawfully
made available to the public if the financial institution has located the
telephone number in a telephone directory or the consumer has informed the
financial institution that the telephone number is not unlisted;
(49) "Qualified individual" means an individual designated by a
financial institution to oversee, implement, and enforce the financial
institution’s information security program;
(50) "Residential mortgage loans serviced" means a specific
portfolio or portfolios of residential mortgage loans for which a licensee is
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
contractually responsible to the owner or owners of the mortgage loans for
the defined servicing activities;
(21)(51) "Reverse mortgage" means a nonrecourse loan that pays a
homeowner loan proceeds drawn from accumulated home equity;
(52) "Risk management assessment" means the functional
evaluations performed under the risk management program and reports provided
to a board of directors under a relevant governance protocol;
(53) "Risk management program" means the policies and procedures
designed to identify, measure, monitor, and mitigate risk sufficient for the
level of sophistication of a covered institution servicer;
(54) "Security event" means an event resulting in unauthorized
access to, or disruption or misuse of:
(A) An information system or information stored on the
information system; or
(B) Customer information held in physical form;
(55) "Service provider" means a person or entity that receives,
maintains, processes, or otherwise is permitted access to customer
information through its provision of services directly to a financial
institution that is subject to this subchapter;
(56) "Servicing liquidity" means the financial resources
necessary to manage liquidity risk arising from servicing functions required
in acquiring and financing mortgage servicing rights, hedging costs, and
margin calls associated with the mortgage servicing rights asset and
financing facilities and advances or costs of advance financing for
principal, interest, taxes, insurance, and any other servicing related
advances;
(22)(57) "Sponsor" means a mortgage broker or mortgage banker
licensed under this subchapter that has assumed the responsibility for and
agrees to supervise the actions of a loan officer or transitional loan
officer;
(58) "Tangible net worth" means the total equity less:
(A) The receivables due from related entities;
(B) Goodwill and other intangibles; and
(C) Pledged assets;
(23)(59) "Transitional loan officer" means an individual who, in
exchange for compensation as an employee of, or who otherwise receives
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
compensation or remuneration from, a mortgage broker or a mortgage banker, is
authorized to act as a loan officer subject to a transitional loan officer
license;
(24)(60) "Transitional loan officer license" means a license
that:
(A) Is issued to an individual who is employed and
sponsored by a mortgage banker or mortgage broker licensed under this
subchapter;
(B) Is limited to a term of no more than one hundred
twenty (120) days; and
(C) Is not subject to reapplication, renewal, or extension
by the commissioner; and
(25)(61) "Unique identifier" means a number or other identifier
assigned by protocols established by the automated licensing system approved
by the commissioner; and
(62) "Whole loans" mean those loans in which a mortgage and the
underlying credit risk is owned and held on the balance sheet of an entity
with all ownership rights.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-39-504 is amended to read as follows:
23-39-504. Rulemaking authority Authority.
(a) The Securities Commissioner may adopt any rules that he or she
deems necessary to:
(1) Carry out the provisions of this subchapter;
(2) Provide for the protection of the borrowing public; and
(3) Provide any requirements necessary for the State of Arkansas
to participate in a multistate automated licensing system; and
(4) Instruct mortgage brokers, mortgage bankers, mortgage
servicers, loan officers, and transitional loan officers in interpreting this
subchapter.
(b) The commissioner may:
(1) If risk is determined by a formal review of a specific
covered institution servicer to be extremely high, order or direct the
covered institution servicer to satisfy additional conditions necessary to
ensure that the covered institution servicer will continue to operate in a
safe and sound manner and be able to continue to service loans in compliance
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
with state law or rule and federal law or regulations;
(2) If risk is determined by a formal review of a specific
covered institution servicer to be extremely low, provide notice that all or
part of this subchapter is not applicable to the covered institution
servicer; and
(3) If economic, environmental, or societal events are
determined to be of severity to warrant a temporary suspension of all or
certain sections of this subchapter, provide public notice of the temporary
suspension.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-39-505(f), concerning the surety bond
under the Fair Mortgage Lending Act, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) Each mortgage broker, mortgage banker, and mortgage servicer
shall post a surety bond in an amount:
(A) Based upon loan activity during the previous year;
(B) Not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);
and
(C) As prescribed by rule or order of the commissioner.
(2) The surety bond shall:
(A) be Be in a form satisfactory to the commissioner; and
(B) Run to the State of Arkansas for benefit of a claimant
against the licensee to secure the faithful performance of the obligations of
the licensee under this subchapter.
(3)(A) A party having a claim against a licensee may bring suit
directly on the surety bond of the licensee under this subsection or the
commissioner may bring suit on behalf of a claimant in one (1) action or in
successive actions.
(B) A consumer claim shall be given priority in recovering
from the surety bond.
(C) Every bond shall provide for suit on the bond by any
person who has a cause of action under this subchapter.
(4) The aggregate liability of the surety shall not exceed the
principal sum of the bond.
(5) A surety bond shall cover claims for at least five (5) years
after the licensee ceases to provide mortgage services in this state or
longer if required by the commissioner.
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
(6)(A) A surety bond shall remain in effect until cancellation.
(B) The cancellation of a surety bond shall occur only
after sixty (60) days' written notice to the commissioner.
(C) The cancellation of a surety bond shall not affect
liability incurred or accrued during the sixty-day period under subdivision
(f)(6)(B) of this section.
(7)(A) If an action is commenced on a licensee's surety bond,
the commissioner may require the filing of a new surety bond.
(B) If a new surety bond is required under subdivision
(f)(7)(A) of this section, the licensee shall file a replacement surety bond
in the required amount specified under subdivision (f)(1)(B) of this section
within thirty (30) days.
(C) Immediately upon recovery of an action on the surety
bond, the licensee shall file a new surety bond.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-39-505(g), concerning audited financial
statements under the Fair Mortgage Lending Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(g)(1) An applicant filing for licensure as a mortgage banker or
mortgage servicer shall file with the commissioner as part of his or her
application audited financial statements that reflect that the applicant has
a net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and are:.
(1) Prepared by an independent certified public accountant:
(2) Prepared according to:
(A) Generally accepted accounting principles as
promulgated by the Financial Accounting Standards Board; or
(B) International financial reporting standards
promulgated by the International Financial Reporting Standards Foundation and
the International Accounting Standards Board;
(3) Accompanied by an opinion acceptable to the commissioner;
and
(4) For purposes of complying with subdivision (g)(1) of this
section, the financial statement shall be:
(A) Determined according to:
(i) Generally accepted accounting principles as
promulgated by the Financial Accounting Standards Board; or
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
(ii) The international financial reporting standards
promulgated by the International Financial Reporting Standards Foundation and
the International Accounting Standards Board; and
(B) Accompanied by an opinion acceptable to the
commissioner;
(C) Dated within fifteen (15) months preceding the date on
which the application is filed.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-39-505, concerning qualifications for a
license under the Fair Mortgage Lending Act, is amended to add additional
subsections to read as follows:
(p)(1) An applicant filing for licensure as a mortgage servicer but
that does not operate as a covered institution servicer shall file with the
commissioner as part of his or her application audited financial statements
that reflect that the applicant has a net worth of at least one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(2) For the purposes of complying with subdivision (p)(1) of
this section, the financial statement shall be:
(A) Determined according to:
(i) Generally accepted accounting principles as
promulgated by the Financial Accounting Standards Board; or
(ii) The international financial reporting standards
promulgated by the International Financial Reporting Standards Foundation and
the International Accounting Standards Board;
(B) Accompanied by an opinion acceptable to the
commissioner; and
(C) Dated within fifteen (15) months preceding the date on
which the application is filed.
(3)(A) An applicant applying to service Arkansas residential
mortgage loans may apply to the commissioner to waive or adjust one (1) or
more of the net worth requirements under subdivision (p)(1) or subdivision
(p)(2) of this section.
(B)(i) In reviewing a request to waive or adjust one (1)
or more of the net worth requirements under subdivision (p)(1) or subdivision
(p)(2) of this section, the commissioner may consider the number and types of
loans being serviced and whether the licensee has a positive net worth and
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
adequate operating reserves.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (p)(3)(B),
“operating reserves” means the funds set aside in anticipation of future
payments or obligations and are included in servicing liquidity.
(q)(1) An applicant filing for licensure as a mortgage servicer that
operates as a covered institution servicer shall file with the commissioner
as part of his or her application proof that the applicant is in compliance
with:
(A) The Federal Housing Finance Agency's Eligibility
Requirements for Enterprise Single-Family Seller/Servicers for minimum
capital ratio; and
(B) The net worth and servicing liquidity requirements,
whether or not the mortgage servicer is approved for government-sponsored
enterprise servicing.
(2) For the purposes of complying with subdivision (q)(1) of
this section, the financial data shall be:
(A) Determined according to:
(i) Generally accepted accounting principles as
promulgated by the Financial Accounting Standards Board; or
(ii) The international financial reporting standards
promulgated by the International Financial Reporting Standards Foundation and
the International Accounting Standards Board;
(B) Accompanied by an opinion acceptable to the
commissioner; and
(C) Dated within fifteen (15) months preceding the date on
which the application is filed.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-39-506(f), concerning audited financial
statements under the Fair Mortgage Lending Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(f)(1) A mortgage banker or a mortgage servicer shall submit audited
financial statements to the commissioner within ninety (90) days after the
end of the mortgage banker's or mortgage servicer's fiscal year.
(2) The audited financial statements submitted to the
commissioner under subdivision (f)(1) of this section shall:
(A) Reflect that the mortgage banker or mortgage servicer
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
has a net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000); and
(B) Comply with the requirements of § 23-39-505(g)(1)-(3).
(3)(A) Failure to timely submit audited financial statements to
the commissioner shall result in a late fee of two hundred fifty dollars
($250).
(B) All or part of the late fee may be waived by the
commissioner for good cause.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-39-506, concerning license renewal under
the Fair Mortgage Lending Act, is amended to add additional subsections to
read as follows:
(g)(1) A mortgage servicer subject to § 23-39-505(p) or § 23-39-505(q)
shall submit audited financial statements to the commissioner within ninety
(90) days after the end of the mortgage servicer's fiscal year.
(2) The audited financial statements submitted to the
commissioner under subdivision (g)(1) of this section shall reflect that the
mortgage servicer has a net worth that remains in compliance with § 23-39-
505(p) or § 23-39-505(q), as applicable.
(3)(A) A licensee servicing Arkansas residential mortgage loans,
other than a covered institution servicer, may apply to the commissioner to
waive or adjust one (1) or more of the net worth requirements.
(B) In considering a request to waive or adjust one (1) or
more of the net worth requirements, the commissioner shall consider the
number and types of loans being serviced and whether the licensee has a
positive net worth and adequate operating reserves.
(C) For purposes of this section, “operating reserves”
means the funds set aside in anticipation of future payments or obligations
and are included in liquidity.
(4)(A) Failure to timely submit audited financial statements to
the commissioner shall result in a late fee of two hundred fifty dollars
($250).
(B) All or part of the late fee may be waived by the
commissioner for good cause.
(h) A covered institution servicer shall remain in compliance with the
requirements of § 23-39-505(q) and § 23-39-519.

02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
SECTION 8. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 39, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
23-39-519. Prudential standards for covered institution servicers —
Financial condition.
(a) A covered institution servicer shall meet or exceed the minimum
financial requirements of the Federal Housing Finance Agency's Eligibility
Requirements for Enterprise Single-Family Seller/Servicers in order to
maintain the capital and servicing liquidity as required by this section and
§ 23-39-505(q).
(b) All financial data shall be determined according to generally
accepted accounting principles or the international financial reporting
standards promulgated by the International Financial Reporting Standards
Foundation and the International Accounting Standards Board.
(c) A covered institution servicer that meets the Federal Housing
Finance Agency's Eligibility Requirements for Enterprise Single-Family
Seller/Servicers for capital, net worth ratio, and servicing liquidity,
whether or not the servicer is approved for government-sponsored enterprises
servicing, or Federal National Mortgage Association servicing, or Federal
Home Loan Mortgage Corporation servicing, satisfies the requirements of
subsection (a) and subsection (b) of this section.
(d)(1) A covered institution servicer shall maintain written policies
and procedures implementing the capital and servicing liquidity requirements.
(2) The policies and procedures under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall include a sustainable written methodology for satisfying the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section and be available to the
Securities Commissioner upon request.
(e)(1) A covered institution servicer under this subchapter shall:
(A) Maintain sufficient allowable assets for liquidity in
addition to the amounts required for servicing liquidity to cover normal
business operations; and
(B) Have in place sound cash management and business
operating plans that match the size and sophistication of the covered
institution servicer to ensure normal business operations.
(2)(A) The management or key individual of a covered institution
servicer shall develop, establish, and implement plans, policies, and
procedures for maintaining operating liquidity sufficient for the ongoing
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
needs of the covered institution servicer.
(B) The plans, policies, and procedures under subdivision
(e)(2)(A) of this section shall:
(i) Contain sustainable, written methodologies for
maintaining sufficient operating liquidity; and
(ii) Be available to the commissioner upon request.

23-39-520. Corporate governance for covered institution servicers.
(a) A covered institution servicer shall establish and maintain a
board of directors who are responsible for the oversight of the covered
institution servicer.
(b) For a covered institution servicer that is not approved to service
loans by a government-sponsored enterprise, the Federal National Mortgage
Association and the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or the Government
National Mortgage Association, or when these federal agencies have granted
approval for a board alternative, a covered institution servicer may
establish a similar body constituted to exercise oversight and fulfill the
board of directors’ responsibilities under subsection (c) of this section.
(c) The board of directors shall be responsible for:
(1) Establishing a written corporate governance framework,
including appropriate internal controls designed to monitor corporate
governance and assess compliance with the corporate governance framework,
available to the Securities Commissioner upon request;
(2) Monitoring and ensuring the covered institution servicer's
compliance with the corporate governance framework and this subchapter; and
(3) Accurate and timely regulatory reporting, including without
limitation the requirements for filing the mortgage call report.
(d)(1) The board of directors shall establish internal audit
requirements that are appropriate for the size, complexity, and risk profile
of the covered institution servicer, with appropriate independence to provide
a reliable evaluation of the covered institution servicer’s internal control
structure, risk management, and governance.
(2) Internal audit requirements established by the board of
directors and the results of internal audits shall be made available to the
commissioner upon request.
(e)(1) A covered institution servicer shall receive an external audit,
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
including audited financial statements and audit reports, conducted by an
independent certified public accountant annually.
(2) The external audit required under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section shall:
(A) Be available to the commissioner upon request; and
(B) Include at a minimum:
(i) Annual financial statements including a balance
sheet, statement of operations income statement and cash flows, notes, and
supplemental schedules, prepared according to generally accepted accounting
principles;
(ii) An assessment of the internal control
structure;
(iii) A computation of tangible net worth;
(iv) Validation of mortgage servicing rights
valuation and reserve methodology, if applicable;
(v) Verification of adequate fidelity and errors and
omissions insurance; and
(vi) Testing of controls related to risk management
activities, including compliance and stress testing, if applicable.
(f)(1) A covered institution servicer shall establish a risk
management program under the oversight of the board of directors that is
available to the commissioner upon request that identifies, measures,
monitors, and controls risk sufficient for the level of sophistication of the
covered institution servicer.
(2) The risk management program required under subdivision
(f)(1) of this section shall:
(A) Have appropriate processes and models in place to
measure, monitor, and mitigate financial risks and changes to the risk
profile of the covered institution servicer and assets being serviced; and
(B) Be scaled to the complexity of the covered institution
servicer, but be sufficiently robust to manage risks in several areas,
including without limitation:
(i) Credit risk, including the potential that a
borrower or counterparty will fail to perform on an obligation;
(ii) Servicing liquidity risk, including the
potential that the covered institution servicer will be unable to meet the
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
covered institution servicer's obligations as the obligations come due
because of an inability to liquidate assets or obtain adequate funding or
that it cannot easily unwind or offset specific exposures;
(iii) Operational risk, including the risk resulting
from inadequate or failed internal processes, people, and systems or from
external events;
(iv) Market risk, including the risk to the covered
institution servicer’s condition resulting from adverse movements in market
rates or prices;
(v) Compliance risk, including the risk of
regulatory sanctions, fines, penalties, or losses resulting from failure to
comply with laws, rules, regulations, or other supervisory requirements
applicable to a covered institution servicer;
(vi) Legal risk, including the potential that
actions against the covered institution servicer that result in unenforceable
contracts, lawsuits, legal sanctions, or adverse judgments can disrupt or
otherwise negatively affect the operations or condition of the covered
institution servicer; and
(vii) Reputation risk, including the risk to
earnings and capital arising from negative publicity regarding the covered
institution servicer’s business practices.
(g)(1) A covered institution servicer shall conduct a risk management
assessment on an annual basis concluding with a formal report to the board of
directors and be available to the commissioner upon request.
(2) Evidence of risk management activities throughout the year
shall be maintained and made part of the report, including findings of issues
and the response to address the findings made in the report.

23-39-521. Standards for safeguarding customer information.
(a) A financial institution shall develop, implement, and maintain a
comprehensive information security program.
(b) The information security program under subsection (a) of this
section shall:
(1) Be written in one (1) or more readily accessible parts; and
(2) Contain administrative, technical, and physical safeguards
that are appropriate to the financial institution’s size and complexity, the
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
nature and scope of the financial institution’s activities, and the
sensitivity of any customer information at issue.
(c) The information security program shall include the information
required under § 23-39-522.

23-39-522. Information security program required elements.
(a) In order for a financial institution to develop, implement, and
maintain an information security program, the financial institution shall
comply with this section.
(b)(1) A financial institution shall designate a qualified individual
responsible for overseeing and implementing the financial institution’s
information security program and enforcing an information security program.
(2)(A) The qualified individual may be employed by the financial
institution, an affiliate, or a service provider.
(B) If a financial institution designates an individual
employed by an affiliate or a service provider, the financial institution
shall:
(i) Retain responsibility for compliance with this
section;
(ii) Designate a senior member of the financial
institution’s personnel to be responsible for direction and oversight of the
qualified individual; and
(iii) Require the service provider or affiliate to
maintain an information security program that protects the financial
institution in accordance with the requirements of this section.
(c)(1) A financial institution shall base the financial institution’s
information security program on a risk assessment that:
(A) Identifies reasonably foreseeable internal and
external risks to the security, confidentiality, and integrity of customer
information that could result in the unauthorized disclosure, misuse,
alteration, destruction, or other compromise of the information; and
(B) Assesses the sufficiency of any safeguards in place to
control these risks.
(2) The risk assessment shall be written and include:
(A) Criteria for the evaluation and categorization of
identified security risks or threats the financial institution faces;
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
(B) Criteria for the assessment of the confidentiality,
integrity, and availability of the financial institution’s information
systems and customer information, including the adequacy of the existing
controls in the context of the identified risks or threats the financial
institution faces; and
(C) Requirements describing how identified risks will be
mitigated or accepted based on the risk assessment and how the information
security program will address the risks.
(3) A financial institution shall periodically perform
additional risk assessments that:
(A) Reexamine the reasonably foreseeable internal and
external risks to the security, confidentiality, and integrity of customer
information that could result in the unauthorized disclosure, misuse,
alteration, destruction, or other compromise of the customer information; and
(B) Reassess the sufficiency of any safeguards in place to
control these risks.
(d) A financial institution shall design and implement safeguards to
control the risks the financial institution identifies through the risk
assessment as required under subsection (c) of this section, including
without limitation:
(1) Implementing and periodically reviewing access controls,
including technical and, as appropriate, physical controls, to:
(A) Authenticate and permit access only to authorized
users to protect against the unauthorized acquisition of customer
information; and
(B) Limit authorized users’ access only to customer
information that the authorized user needs to perform the authorized user’s
duties and functions, or in the case of customers, to access the customer’s
own customer information;
(2) Identifying and managing the data, personnel, devices,
systems, and facilities that enable the financial institution to achieve
business purposes according to the financial institution's relative
importance to business objectives and the financial institution’s risk
strategy;
(3)(A) Protecting by encryption all customer information held or
transmitted by the financial institution both in transit over external
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
networks and at rest.
(B) To the extent the financial institution determines
that encryption of customer information, either in transit over external
networks or at rest, is infeasible, the financial institution may instead
secure the customer information using effective alternative compensating
controls reviewed and approved by the financial institution’s qualified
individual;
(4) Adopting secure development practices for in-house developed
applications utilized by the financial institution for transmitting,
accessing, or storing customer information and procedures for evaluating,
assessing, or testing the security of externally developed applications the
financial institution utilizes to transmit, access, or store customer
information;
(5) Implementing multifactor authentication for an individual
accessing an information system, unless the financial institution’s qualified
individual has approved in writing the use of reasonably equivalent or more
secure access controls;
(6) Developing, implementing, and maintaining procedures for the
secure disposal of customer information in any format no later than two (2)
years after the last date the customer information is used in connection with
the provision of a financial product or service to the customer, unless the
customer information is:
(A) Necessary for business operations or for other
legitimate business purposes;
(B) Otherwise required to be retained by state law or
rule, or federal law or regulation; or
(C) Where targeted disposal is not reasonably feasible due
to the manner in which the information is maintained;
(7) Periodically reviewing the financial institution’s data
retention policy to minimize the unnecessary retention of data;
(8) Adopting procedures for change management; and
(9) Implementing policies, procedures, and controls designed to
monitor and log the activity of authorized users and detect unauthorized
access or use of, or tampering with, customer information by these users.
(e)(1) A financial institution shall regularly test or otherwise
monitor the effectiveness of the safeguards' key controls, systems, and
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
procedures of the safeguards' required under this section, including those to
detect actual and attempted attacks on, or intrusions into, information
systems.
(2)(A) For information systems, monitoring and testing shall
include continuous monitoring or periodic penetration testing and
vulnerability assessments.
(B) Absent effective continuous monitoring or other
systems to detect, on an ongoing basis, changes in information systems that
may create vulnerabilities, the financial institution shall conduct:
(i) Annual penetration testing of a financial
institution’s information systems determined each given year based on
relevant identified risks according to the risk assessment; and
(ii) Vulnerability assessments, including a systemic
scan or review of an information system reasonably designed to identify
publicly known security vulnerabilities in the financial institution’s
information systems based on the risk assessment, at least every six (6)
months, and whenever there are:
(a) Material changes to the financial
institution’s operations or business arrangements; and
(b) Circumstances the financial institution
knows or has reason to know may have a material impact on the financial
institution’s information security program.
(f) A financial institution shall implement policies and procedures to
ensure that personnel are able to enact the financial institution’s
information security program by:
(1) Providing the financial institution’s personnel with
security awareness training that is updated as necessary to reflect risks
identified by the risk assessment;
(2) Utilizing qualified information security personnel employed
by the financial institution or an affiliate or a service provider sufficient
to manage the financial institution’s information security risks and to
perform or oversee the information security program;
(3) Providing information security personnel with security
updates and training sufficient to address relevant security risks; and
(4) Verifying that key information security personnel take steps
to maintain current knowledge of changing information security threats and
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
countermeasures.
(g) A financial institution shall oversee service providers by:
(1) Taking reasonable steps to select and retain service
providers that are capable of maintaining appropriate safeguards for the
customer information at issue;
(2) Requiring the financial institution’s service providers by
contract to implement and maintain the safeguards referenced under
subdivision (g)(1) of this section; and
(3) Periodically assessing the financial institution’s service
providers based on the risk they present and the continued adequacy of their
safeguards.
(h) A financial institution shall evaluate and adjust the financial
institution’s information security program to reflect:
(1) The results of the testing and monitoring required by
subsection (e) of this section;
(2) Any material change to the financial institution’s
operations or business arrangements or other circumstances;
(3) The results of risk assessments performed under subdivision
(c)(3) of this section; and
(4) Any other circumstances that the financial institution knows
or has reason to know may have a material impact on the financial
institution's information security program.
(i)(1) A financial institution shall establish a written incident
response plan designed to promptly respond to, and recover from, any security
event materially affecting the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of
customer information in the financial institution’s control.
(2) The incident response plan under subdivision (i)(1) of this
section shall address:
(A) The goals of the incident response plan;
(B) The internal processes for responding to a security
event;
(C) The definition of clear roles, responsibilities, and
levels of decision-making authority;
(D) External and internal communications and information
sharing;
(E) Identification of requirements for the remediation of
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
any identified weaknesses in information systems and associated controls;
(F) Documentation and reporting regarding security events
and related incident response activities; and
(G) The evaluation and revision as necessary of the
incident response plan following a security event.
(j)(1) The financial institution’s qualified individual shall report
in writing at least annually, to the financial institution’s board of
directors or equivalent governing body.
(2) If a board of directors or equivalent governing body does
not exist, the report required under subdivision (j)(1) of this section shall
be timely presented to a senior officer responsible for the financial
institution’s information security program.
(3) The report required under subdivision (j)(1) of this section
shall include:
(A) The overall status of the information security program
and the financial institution’s compliance with this section and associated
rules; and
(B) Material matters related to the information security
program, addressing issues such as risk assessment, risk management and
control decisions, service provider arrangements, results of testing,
security events or violations and management’s responses to security events
or violations, and recommendations for changes in the information security
program.
(k) A financial institution shall provide notice to the Securities
Commissioner about notification events according to subdivisions (l)(1) and
(2) of this section.
(l)(1) Upon discovery of a notification event as described in
subdivision (l)(3) of this section, if the notification event involves the
information of any consumers in this state, the financial institution shall
notify the commissioner as soon as possible and no later forty-five (45) days
after discovery of the notification event.
(2) The notice required under subdivision (l)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Be made in a format specified by the commissioner; and
(B) Include the following information:
(i) The name and contact information of the
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
reporting financial institution;
(ii)(a) A description of the types of information
that were involved in the notification event.
(b) If the information is possible to
determine under subdivision (l)(2)(B)(ii)(a) of this section, the notice
required under subdivision (l)(1) of this section shall contain the date or
date range of the notification event;
(iii) The number of consumers affected or
potentially affected by the notification event;
(iv) A general description of the notification
event; and
(v)(a) Whether a law enforcement official has
provided the financial institution with a written determination that
notifying the public of the notification event would impede a criminal
investigation or cause damage to national security, and a means for the
commissioner to contact the law enforcement official.
(b) A law enforcement official under
subdivision (l)(2)(B)(v)(a) of this section may request an initial delay of
up to thirty (30) days following the date when notice was provided to the
commissioner.
(c) The delay under subdivision
(l)(2)(B)(v)(b) of this section may be extended for an additional period of
up to sixty (60) days if the law enforcement official seeks an extension in
writing.
(d) An additional delay beyond the delay under
subdivision (l)(2)(B)(v)(b) of this section may be permitted only if the
State Securities Department determines that public disclosure of a
notification event continues to impede a criminal investigation or cause
damage to national security.
(3)(A) A notification event under this section shall be treated
as discovered as of the first day on which the notification event is known to
the financial institution.
(B) The financial institution under subdivision (l)(3)(A)
of this section shall be deemed to have knowledge of a notification event if
the notification event is known to a person, other than the person committing
the notification event, who is the financial institution’s employee, officer,
02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120

HB1466
or other agent.
(m) A financial institution shall establish a written plan addressing
business continuity and disaster recovery.

23-39-523. Exceptions.
This subchapter does not apply to a financial institution that
maintains customer information concerning fewer than five thousand (5,000)
consumers.




























02/12/2025 2:18:59 PM ANS120